Massachusetts, session 194th, H2771.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “prisoners;” in line 275 the following words:-
"employees of the department of children and families holding the position of attorney who have
been employed in such capacities for 10 years or more".
of 1